Colorado, session 2026A, HB1184.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 2-3-1203, repeal
(17)(a)(IV); and add (24)(a)(II) as follows:
2-3-1203. Sunset review of advisory committees - legislative
declaration - definition - repeal.
(17) (a) The following statutory authorizations for the designated
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

advisory committees will repeal on September 1, 2026:
(IV) The Colorado forest health council created in section
23-31-316;
(24) (a) The following statutory authorizations for the designated
advisory committees will repeal on September 1, 2033:
(II) THE COLORADO FOREST HEALTH COUNCIL CREATED IN SECTION
23-31-316;
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 23-31-316, amend
(3)(a) introductory portion, (3)(a)(I) introductory portion, (3)(a)(II)(N), and
(7); repeal (3)(a)(III); and add (3)(a)(I)(G) and (3)(a)(II)(O) as follows:
23-31-316. Colorado forest health council - legislative
declaration.
(3) Membership.
(a) The council consists of the following twenty-six TWENTY-FIVE
members:
(I) The following ex officio members or there THEIR designees:
(G) THE COMMISSIONER OF AGRICULTURE OR THE COMMISSIONER'S
DESIGNEE; AND
(II) The following members appointed by the governor:
(N) One member who is employed by or associated with an
organization that advocates for motorized recreation; and
(O) ONE MEMBER WHO IS A CONSERVATION DISTRICT BOARD
SUPERVISOR, ELECTED UNDER SECTION 35-70-107, OR WHO IS AN EMPLOYEE
OF A CONSERVATION DISTRICT, CREATED UNDER ARTICLE 70 OF ARTICLE 35.
(III) Two members of the general assembly, including a majority
and minority representative from the wildfire matters review committee,
one appointed by the president of the senate and one appointed by the
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1184

speaker of the house of representatives;
(7) Repeal. This section is repealed, effective September 1, 2026
SEPTEMBER 1, 2033. Before the repeal, this section is scheduled for review
in accordance with section 2-3-1203.
SECTION 3. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the state
constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act within
such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect unless
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1184

approved by the people at the general election to be held in November 2026
and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the official declaration of
the vote thereon by the governor.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1184